Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB42.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 309 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 11 of this Act, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Board" means the Kentucky Board of Licensure for Professional Music
Therapists created under Section 2 of this Act;
(2) "Board-certified music therapist" means a person who holds current board
certification from the Certification Board for Music Therapists;
(3) "Licensed professional music therapist" or "LPMT" means a person who has
been issued a license by the board for the practice of music therapy as an allied
health professional;
(4) "Music therapy" means the clinical and evidence-based use of music therapy
interventions to accomplish individualized goals for people of all ages and ability
levels within a therapeutic relationship by a board-certified music therapist;
(5) "Music therapy interventions" include but are not limited to:
(a) Music improvisation;
(b) Receptive music listening;
(c) Songwriting;
(d) Song lyric discussion;
(e) Imagery and music;
(f) Singing;
(g) Music performance;
(h) Learning through music;
(i) Music combined with other arts;
(j) Music-assisted relaxation;
(k) Music-based patient education;
Page 1 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
(l) Electronic music technology;
(m) Adapted music intervention; and
(n) Movement to music;
(6) "Music therapy treatment plan" means an individualized treatment plan within
an interdisciplinary team, as applicable, with goals, objectives, and potential
strategies of the music therapy interventions that are appropriate for the client
and setting; and
(7) "Practice of music therapy":
(a) Includes but is not limited to:
1. Accepting referrals for music therapy services from:
a. Medical, mental health, or education professionals;
b. Family members;
c. Clients;
d. Caregivers; and
e. Others involved and authorized with the provision of client
services;
2. Conducting a music therapy assessment of a client to determine if
music therapy treatment is indicated. If treatment is indicated,
collecting systematic, comprehensive, and accurate information to
determine the type of music therapy service to provide;
3. Developing a music therapy treatment plan;
4. Implementing a music therapy treatment plan that is consistent with
any other services being provided;
5. Evaluating the client's response to the music therapy treatment plan,
documenting any change or progress, and suggesting modifications as
appropriate;
6. Developing a plan for determining when the provision of music
Page 2 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
therapy services is no longer needed in collaboration with the client,
physician, other health care provider, and any other appropriate
person the client relies on for support;
7. Minimizing any barriers to ensure that the client receives music
therapy services in the least restrictive environment; and
8. Collaborating with and educating a client's support system on the
needs of the client that are being addressed in music therapy and the
manner in which the treatment plan is addressing those needs; and
(b) Does not include the screening, diagnosis, or assessment of any physical,
mental, or communication disorder, or the administration of psychological
testing.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 309 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby created the Kentucky Board of Licensure for Professional Music
Therapists that shall be attached to the Department of Professional Licensing in
the Public Protection Cabinet for administrative purposes. The board shall
consist of five (5) members who are United States citizens and have been
Kentucky residents for at least five (5) years prior to appointment. The board
membership shall be as follows:
(a) Three (3) members shall be music therapists who are licensed under Section
4 of this Act and have engaged in the teaching or practice of music therapy
for at least three (3) years. The member shall not hold any elected or
appointed office in any professional organization of music therapy or
closely related field during his or her tenure on the board;
(b) One (1) member shall be a health care provider as defined in KRS 304.17A-
005 who is not a music therapist. This member shall not hold any elected or
appointed office in any professional organization of music therapy or
Page 3 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
closely related field during his or her tenure on the board; and
(c) One (1) member shall represent the public. The public member shall not
have been licensed or have practiced as a music therapist, nor have any
significant financial interest, either direct or indirect, in the profession of
music therapy.
(2) All members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor for staggered terms
of four (4) years.
(3) Each member shall hold office until a successor is appointed. Vacancies shall be
filled in the same manner as original appointments. Members may serve
consecutive terms.
(4) Members of the board shall receive no compensation, perquisite, or allowance.
(5) The board shall annually elect from its membership a chairperson, secretary, and
other officers as necessary to carry out its duties.
(6) (a) The board shall meet at least four (4) times each year. Additional meetings
may be called by the chairperson upon the written request of at least (2)
members of the board.
(b) A simple majority of the board members shall constitute a quorum of the
board.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 309 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A as necessary to carry out the provisions of Sections 1 to 11 of this
Act, including:
(a) Issuing and renewing licenses to applicants who meet the requirements of
Sections 4 and 5 of this Act;
(b) Denying, suspending, or revoking a license to practice music therapy;
(c) Censuring, reprimanding, or placing a license holder or applicant on
Page 4 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
probation or under supervisory conditions for a period not to exceed one (1)
year;
(d) Maintaining a current register of license holders as a matter of public
record;
(e) Establishing procedures for receiving, investigating, and resolving
complaints against license holders;
(f) Conducting administrative hearings in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B
for disciplinary actions taken under authority of paragraphs (b) and (c) of
this subsection and Sections 7 and 8 of this Act;
(g) 1. Assessing fees for the issuance and renewal of licenses to cover
administrative and operating expenses of the board; and
2. Authorizing all disbursements necessary to carry out the provisions of
Sections 1 to 11 of this Act; and
(h) Establishing:
1. A code of ethics for license holders;
2. Continuing education requirements by adopting the Certification
Board for Music Therapists guidelines on continuing education; and
3. Conditions for inactive status and return to active status for license
holders.
(2) The board shall set through administrative regulation the amount of the fees
required to be paid by applicants for licensure and license holders, including but
not limited to:
(a) For an application for initial licensure as a licensed professional music
therapist, a nonrefundable fee not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200);
(b) A renewal fee for a licensed professional music therapist not to exceed two
hundred dollars ($200);
(c) For a duplicate or replacement license, a fee not to exceed twenty-five
Page 5 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
dollars ($25);
(d) For failure to renew a license for a licensed professional music therapist
within the allotted grace period pursuant to Section 5 of this Act, a
reinstatement fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100); and
(e) Other reasonable fees for administrative services.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 309 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall issue a license, for a period of two (2) years, as a music therapist
to any person who files a completed application, accompanied by the required
fees, and who submits satisfactory evidence that the applicant is at least eighteen
(18) years of age and demonstrates professional competence by:
(a) Holding a bachelor's degree or higher in music therapy or its equivalent,
including clinical training hours from a program approved by the American
Music Therapy Association or any successor organization within an
accredited college or university; and
(b) Providing proof:
1. Of:
a. Passing the examination for board certification offered by the
Certification Board for Music Therapists or any successor
organization; or
b. Being transitioned into board certification; and
2. That the applicant is currently a board-certified music therapist.
(2) The board may issue a license to an applicant without examination by the
Certification Board for Music Therapists or who has not met the requirements
established by the American Music Therapy Association if the person possesses a
valid regulatory document issued by the appropriate examining board under the
laws of any other state or territory of the United States, the District of Columbia,
Page 6 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
or any foreign nation that, in the judgment of the board, has requirements
substantially equivalent to or exceeding the requirements in this section.
(3) The board may facilitate the development of materials to educate the public
concerning music therapist licensure.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 309 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) After December 31, 2026, each license holder shall renew his or her license to
practice music therapy biennially by:
(a) Submitting a renewal application on a form provided by the board;
(b) Paying the license renewal fee; and
(c) Producing evidence of maintenance of the applicant's status as a board-
certified music therapist.
(2) A ninety (90) day grace period shall be allowed for each license holder after the
licensure period, during which time the license may be renewed upon payment of
the renewal fee, the late fee, and compliance with all renewal requirements.
(3) (a) Any license granted by the board shall be automatically suspended if the
holder fails to apply for the license renewal pursuant to this section within a
period of ninety (90) days after the renewal deadline.
(b) Any suspended license may be restored by the board upon payment of a
reinstatement fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100), in addition to
any unpaid renewal or late fees.
(c) Failure to renew a license within ninety (90) days from the date of
suspension as provided in this section shall cause the license to be
automatically revoked.
(d) Reinstatement of a revoked license shall require the license holder to
reapply and meet all current standards for licensure required by Sections 1
to 11 of this Act.
Page 7 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
(4) A person licensed under Section 4 of this Act who intends to retire as a licensed
professional music therapist shall notify the board in writing before the
expiration of his or her current license. If, within a period of five (5) years from
the year of retirement, the license holder wishes to resume practice as a licensed
professional music therapist, he or she shall notify the board in writing and upon
giving proof of completing the required continuing education and the payment of
an amount equivalent to elapsed renewal fees, the license shall be restored in full
effect.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 309 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) After December 31, 2026, a person shall not:
(a) Engage in the practice of music therapy; or
(b) Use the title "board-certified music therapist," "licensed professional music
therapist," "LPMT," or a title or letters that are substantially the same, or
hold himself or herself out as having this status;
unless he or she is licensed by the board under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act.
(2) (a) Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall not apply to a person licensed, certified, or
registered under any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, or
personnel supervised by a licensed professional, who is performing work,
including the use of music, incidental to the practice of his or her licensed,
certified, or regulated profession or occupation if that person does not
represent himself or herself as a music therapist. This includes but is not
limited to:
1. Physicians;
2. Psychologists;
3. Psychoanalysts;
4. Registered nurses;
Page 8 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
5. Physical therapists;
6. Marriage and family therapists;
7. Social workers;
8. Occupational therapists;
9. Professional or rehabilitation counselors; and
10. Speech-language pathologists or audiologists.
(b) Nothing in Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall be construed to limit, interfere
with, or restrict the practice, descriptions of services, or manner in which a
person described in paragraph (a) of this subsection holds himself of herself
out to the public.
(c) Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall not apply to a person whose training and
national certification attests to his or her preparation and ability to practice
his or her certified profession or occupation if that person does not
represent himself or herself as a music therapist.
(d) Nothing in Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall be construed to alter, amend, or
interfere with the practice of employment counseling, job placement
counseling, or school counseling.
(3) Nothing in Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall be construed to apply to the activities
and services of a student intern or trainee in music therapy who is pursuing a
program of studies in music therapy if the:
(a) Activities are performed under the supervision of a licensed professional
music therapist;
(b) Activities constitute a part of the supervised program of study; and
(c) Person is designated as a music therapist intern or student in training.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 309 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board may refuse to issue, deny, suspend or revoke, impose probationary
Page 9 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
conditions upon, issue a written reprimand or admonishment, or perform any
combination thereof regarding any license held or applied for under the
provisions of Section 4 of this Act if the person:
(a) Is found guilty of fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in procuring or
renewing or attempting to procure or renew a license to practice music
therapy;
(b) Committed any unfair, false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice;
(c) Has been negligent in the practice of music therapy;
(d) Is adjudicated mentally incompetent by a court;
(e) Has been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony involving sexual
misconduct or where dishonesty is a necessary element, if in accordance
with KRS Chapter 335B. Conviction shall include all instances in which a
plea of no contest is the basis of the conviction. A certified copy of the
record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction;
(f) Is found guilty of unprofessional or unethical conduct in this or any other
jurisdiction;
(g) Has been using any controlled substance or alcoholic beverage to an extent
or in a manner dangerous to the person, any other person, or the public, or
to an extent that the use impairs the ability to perform as a licensed
professional music therapist;
(h) Has violated any provision of Sections 1 to 11 of this Act or administrative
regulations promulgated thereunder;
(i) Failed to comply with an order issued by the board or an assurance of
voluntary compliance; or
(j) Willfully or negligently divulges a professional confidence.
(2) Disciplinary proceedings may be initiated upon the receipt by the board of a
sworn complaint by any person, including members of the board.
Page 10 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
(3) No sooner than two (2) years from the date of revocation, any person whose
license has been revoked may petition the board for reinstatement. The board
shall investigate the petition and may reinstate the licensee if the board finds that
the individual has complied with any terms prescribed by the board and is able to
competently engage in the practice of music therapy.
(4) If, after an investigation that includes an opportunity for the licensee to respond,
the board determines that a violation took place but was not of a serious nature, it
may issue a written admonishment to the licensee. A copy of the admonishment
shall be placed in the permanent file of the licensee. The licensee shall have the
right to file a response to the admonishment within thirty (30) days of its receipt
and to have the response placed in the permanent file of the licensee. The
licensee may alternatively, within thirty (30) days of the receipt, file a request for
a hearing with the board. Upon receipt of this request, the board shall set aside
the written admonishment and set the matter for a hearing under KRS Chapter
13B.
(5) The surrender of a license shall not deprive the board of its jurisdiction to
proceed with actions authorized under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 309 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Before denying, revoking, suspending, imposing probationary or supervisory
conditions upon a license, issuing a written reprimand or admonishment, or
doing any combination of those regarding any licensee or applicant under
Sections 1 to 11 of this Act, the board shall set the matter for hearing under KRS
Chapter 13B.
(2) After revoking, suspending, imposing probationary or supervisory conditions
upon a license, issuing a written reprimand or admonishment, or doing any
combination of those regarding any licensee or applicant, the board shall set the
Page 11 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
matter for a hearing upon the written request of the applicant or licensee within
thirty (30) days of the applicant's or licensee's receipt of the letter advising him or
her of the denial, refusal, admonishment, revocation, suspension, or other
disciplinary action taken.
(3) Any party aggrieved by a final order of the board may appeal to the Circuit Court
of the county where the alleged violation occurred as provided under KRS
Chapter 13B.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 309 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Before a licensed professional music therapist provides music therapy services to
a client for an identified clinical or developmental need, or a mental health or
substance use disorder, the licensee shall review the client's diagnosis, treatment
needs, and treatment plan with the health care providers involved in the client's
care.
(2) Before a licensed professional music therapist provides music therapy services to
a student for an identified educational need in a special education setting, the
licensee shall review the individualized family service plan or review with the
education program team the student's diagnosis, treatment needs, and treatment
plan.
(3) During the provision of music therapy services to a client, the licensed
professional music therapist shall:
(a) Collaborate, as applicable, with the client's health care providers;
(b) If the client has a communication disorder, collaborate and discuss the
music therapy treatment plan with the client's audiologist or speech-
language pathologist so that a music therapist may work with the client and
address communication skills; and
(c) If the client has a mental health or substance use disorder, collaborate and
Page 12 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
discuss the music therapy treatment plan with the client's primary mental
health or substance use disorder professional so that a music therapist may
work with the client to help address mental health or substance use disorder
needs.
(4) When providing educational or health care services, a licensed professional
music therapist shall not replace the services provided by an audiologist or a
speech-language pathologist.
(5) Unless authorized to practice speech-language pathology, nothing in Sections 1
to 11 of this Act shall authorize a licensed professional music therapist to
evaluate, examine, instruct, or counsel on speech, language, communication, or
swallowing disorders and conditions.
(6) A licensed professional music therapist shall not represent himself or herself as
authorized to treat a communication disorder, but may represent himself or
herself as working with clients who have communication disorders and address
communication skills.
(7) A licensed professional music therapist shall not represent himself or herself as
authorized to treat a mental health or substance use disorder, but may represent
himself or herself as working with clients who have a mental health or substance
use disorder when in communication with a client's primary mental health or
substance use disorder professional.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 309 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be known
as the Kentucky Board of Licensure for Professional Music Therapists fund. All
moneys received by the board under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall be deposited into
this fund and shall be used by the board for the administration of the board and for
carrying out the provisions of Sections 1 to 11 of this Act. The fund shall be
Page 13 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 267
administered by the Department of Professional Licensing in the Public Protection
Cabinet. Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall
not lapse. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, amounts in the fund at the close of any fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 309 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Any person who violates or aids in the violation of Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall,
upon conviction, be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
Section 12. The initial appointments to the Kentucky Board of Licensure for
Professional Music Therapists shall consist of three (3) music therapists who are not
licensed under Section 4 of this Act but who have been engaged in their respective
practices for at least five (5) years. Once licensing under this Act is implemented, music
therapists appointed to the board shall hold the requisite license. The initial appointments
of board members shall have staggered terms as follows:
(a) Two (2) members shall serve a term of three (3) years;
(b) Two (2) members shall serve a term of two (2) years; and
(c) One (1) member shall serve a term of one (1) year.
Page 14 of 14
XXXX 12/5/2024 2:52 PM Jacketed